src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Cebuano language are attatched to the left of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
@U.Superl.No@:@U.Superl.No@ Adjectives ;
@U.Superl.Yes@:@U.Superl.Yes@pinaka%< Adjectives ; !Der/Superl
!nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
verb_prefixes ;

LEXICON verb_prefixes
!!! MAG- Verbs
@U.Asp.Comp@:@U.Asp.Comp@nag    mag_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@nag    mag_redup ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@mag    mag_redup ;
@U.Asp.Imp@:@U.Asp.Imp@mag      mag_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Inf@                     mag_verbs ;

!!! MA- Verbs
@U.Asp.Comp@:@U.Asp.Comp@na     ma_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@na     ma_redup ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@ma     ma_redup ;
@U.Asp.Imp@:@U.Asp.Imp@ma       ma_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Inf@                     ma_verbs ;

!!! -UM- Verbs
@U.Asp.Comp@                            um_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@%{R%}%{E%}     um_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@%{R%}%{E%}     um_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Imp@                             um_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Inf@                             um_verbs ;

!!! -IN- Verbs
@U.Asp.Comp@                            in_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@%{R%}%{E%}     in_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@%{R%}%{E%}     in_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Imp@                             in_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Inf@                             in_verbs ;

LEXICON mag_redup
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@%{R%}%{E%}     mag_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@%{R%}%{E%}     mag_verbs ;

LEXICON ma_redup
@U.Asp.Prog@:@U.Asp.Prog@%{R%}%{E%}     ma_verbs ;
@U.Asp.Cont@:@U.Asp.Cont@%{R%}%{E%}     ma_verbs ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
